Utah statutes.
58-68-304.   License renewal requirements.
(1)  As a condition precedent for license renewal, each licensee shall, during
each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by division rule:
(a)  complete qualified continuing professional education requirements in
accordance with the number of hours and standards defined by division rule in
collaboration with the board;
(b)  appoint a contact person for access to medical records and an alternate
contact person for access to medical records in accordance with Subsection
58-68-302(1)(j); and
(c)  if the licensee practices osteopathic medicine in a location with no
other persons licensed under this chapter, provide some method of notice to
the licensee's patients of the identity and location of the contact person and
alternate contact person for access to medical records for the licensee in
accordance with Subsection 58-68-302(1)(k).
(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-68-303, the
continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section are
increased or decreased proportionally.
